North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-38 Organic Foods Standards [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 78, § 1]

4-38-01.
Legislative intent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 64, § 4.

4-38-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 78, § 1.

4-38-02.1.
Certifying agent — Registration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 78, § 1.

4-38-03.
Production standards. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 64, § 4.

4-38-04.
Compliance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 64, § 4.

4-38-05.
Violations — Ineligibility — Reporting of violations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 64, § 4.

4-38-06.
Rules. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 64, § 4.

4-38-07.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 78, § 1.